North Carolina statutes. Chapter 15. Criminal Procedure.
Article 15A. Investigation of Offenses Involving Abandonment and Nonsupport of Children.

§ 15-155.1.
Reports to district attorneys of Work First Family Assistance and out-of-wedlock births.

The Department of Health and Human Services by and through the Secretary of Health and Human Services shall promptly after June 19, 1959, make a report to each district attorney, setting out the names and addresses of all mothers who reside in his prosecutorial district as defined in

G.S. 7A-60

and are recipients of assistance under the provisions of Part 2, Article 2, Chapter 108A of the General Statutes. Such report shall in some manner show the identity of the unwed mothers and shall set forth the number of children born to each said mother. Such a report shall also be made monthly thereafter setting out the names and addresses of all such mothers who reside in the district and who may have become recipients of assistance under the provisions of Part 2, Article 2, Chapter 108A of the General Statutes since the date of the last report.

History.

1959, c. 1210, s. 1; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 476, s. 138; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 50; 1997-443, ss. 11A.118(a), 12.23.

Local Modification.

(As to Article 15A) Gaston and Mecklenburg: 1959, c. 1210.

§ 15-155.2.
District attorney to take action on report of Work First Family Assistance and children born out of wedlock.

Upon receipt of such reports as are provided for in

G.S. 15-155.1

, the district attorney of superior court may make an investigation to determine whether the mother of an out-of-wedlock child or who is a recipient of Work First Family Assistance, has abandoned, is willfully neglecting or is refusing to support and maintain the child within the meaning of

G.S. 14-326

or 49-2 or is diverting any part of the funds received as Work First Family Assistance to any purpose other than for the support and maintenance of a child in violation of G.S. 108-76.1. In making this investigation the district attorney is authorized to call upon:

Any county board of social services or the Department of Health and Human Services for personal, clerical or investigative assistance and for access to any records kept by either such board and relating to the matter under investigation and such boards are hereby directed to assist in all investigations hereunder and to furnish all records relating thereto when so requested by the district attorney;

The board of county commissioners of any county within his district for legal or clerical assistance in making any investigation or investigations in such county and such boards are hereby authorized to furnish such assistance in their discretion; and

The district attorney of any inferior court in his district for personal assistance in making any investigation or investigations in the county in which the court is located and any district attorney so called upon is hereby authorized to furnish such assistance by and with the consent of the board of county commissioners of the county in which the court is located, which board shall provide and fix his compensation for assistance furnished.

If following the investigation the district attorney has reasonable grounds to believe that a violation of

G.S. 49-2

, 14-326, 108-76.1 or any other criminal offense is being or has been committed, he shall send to the grand jury of the county in which he believes the offense is being or has been committed a bill of indictment charging the commission of the offense. Sole and exclusive jurisdiction of offenses discovered as a result of investigations under this section shall be vested in the superior court notwithstanding any other provisions of law, whether general, special or local. Provided nothing in this Article shall be construed to take from the inferior courts any authority or responsibility now vested in them by existing law or to compel the district attorney to again prosecute a crime that has been disposed of in the inferior courts.

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 589, s. 8.

History.

1959, c. 1210, s. 1; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 476, s. 138; 1985, c. 589, s. 8; 1997-443, ss. 11A.118(a), 12.24; 2013-198, s. 4.

§ 15-155.3.
Disclosure of information by district attorney or agent.

No such district attorney, assistant district attorney, or any attorney-at-law especially appointed to assist the district attorney, or any agent or employee of the district attorney’s office shall disclose any information, record, report, case history or any memorandum or document or any information contained therein, which may relate to or be connected with the mother or father of any child born out of wedlock, or any child born out of wedlock, unless in the opinion of the district attorney it is necessary or is required in the prosecution and performance of the district attorney’s duties as set forth in the provisions of this Article.

History.

1959, c. 1210, s. 4; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; 2013-198, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-198, s. 5, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “mother or father of any child born out of wedlock, or any child born out of wedlock” for “mother or father of any illegitimate child, or any illegitimate child”; and made minor stylistic changes.